Tennessee, session 114, HB0857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-4-603(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) The office of open records counsel shall facilitate the convening of meetings
of the advisory committee on open government, including selecting a date for the
required annual meeting in the absence of co-chairs.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0857
002638
- 1 -